Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5833.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5-10-23 of the General Laws in Chapter 5-10 entitled "Barbers,
Hairdressers, Cosmeticians, Manicurists and Estheticians" is hereby amended to read as follows:
5-10-23. Fixed place of business.
(a) Except as provided in this section, manicuring, esthetics, barbering and/or hairdressing
and cosmetic therapy, as defined in this chapter, shall be practiced only in a shop licensed under §
5-10-15. Nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the practice of barbering,
manicuring, and hairdressing and cosmetic therapy and esthetics in the same shop or place of
business.
(b) Nothing in this section shall restrict a hairdresser licensed pursuant to this chapter,
operating in a licensed nursing service agency, from providing services to an individual who is
homebound at their home. For purposes of this section, “homebound” is defined as any person who
is considered housebound for purpose of federal Medicare eligibility.
(c) Nothing in this section shall restrict any person licensed pursuant to this chapter from
providing services to an individual who is homebound, or has special needs or sensory-related
disorders or differences, at their home as verified by a licensed healthcare professional.
(d) Nothing in this section shall restrict or prohibit any person licensed pursuant to this
chapter from providing services to an individual residing in any Department of Housing and Urban
Development (H.U.D.) recognized housing for the elderly in the H.U.D. recognized housing in

which the individual resides. Those services shall be provided in a separate room inspected by the
department of health. Students enrolled in programs of hairdressing, barbering and/or cosmetology
are prohibited in H.U.D. recognized housing.
(e) Nothing in this section shall restrict or prohibit any person licensed pursuant to this
chapter from providing services to an individual outside a licensed shop as part of a special occasion
event, such as a wedding or prom, so long as those services are limited to hair styling and makeup,
and the health and sanitation standards expected of licensees in licensed shops are followed.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002016/SUB A
========
LC002016/SUB A - Page 2 of 3